Maryland, session 2026, HB1264.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1264*

HOUSE BILL 1264
15–103.
(a) (1) The Secretary shall administer the Maryland Medical Assistance
Program.
(2) The Program:
(xxvii) Beginning on January 1, 2026, if providing coverage for
the delivery of anesthesia, shall provide coverage for the delivery of anesthesia in
accordance with § 15–862 of the Insurance Article; [and]
(xxviii) Beginning on January 1, 2026, shall provide calcium score
testing in accordance with § 15–863 of the Insurance Article; AND
(XXIX) SHALL PROVIDE, SUBJECT TO THE LIMITATIONS OF
THE STATE BUDGET, AND AS PERMITTED BY FEDERAL LAW, INDIVIDUAL AND GROUP
COUNSELING FOR THE PURPOSE OF TOBACCO CESSATION.
15–160.
THE PROGRAM AND A MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION MAY NOT REQUIRE A
PRIOR AUTHORIZATION FOR ANY PRODUCT OR SERVICE FOR USE IN ELIMINATING
AN INDIVIDUAL’S DEPENDENCE ON TOBACCO.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.